Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2804.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 182.6526, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) The terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given. (b) "Aggregated employee work speed data" means a compilation of employee work speed data for multiple employees, in summary form, assembled in full or in another form such that the data cannot be identified with any individual. new text begin (c) "Automatic external defibrillator" or "AED" means an electronic device designed and manufactured to operate automatically or semiautomatically for the purpose of delivering an electrical current to the heart of a person in sudden cardiac arrest. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end "Commissioner" means the commissioner of labor and industry. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end (1) Except as provided in clause (2), "employee" means a person who meets the definition in section 182.651, subdivision 9, and who works at a warehouse distribution center. (2) For the purposes of subdivisions 2, 3, deleted text begin anddeleted text end 4new text begin , and 5anew text end only, "employee" means a person who: (i) meets the definition in section 182.651, subdivision 9; (ii) does not meet any of the exceptions under section 177.23, subdivision 7, clauses (1) to (19); and (iii) performs warehouse work occurring on the property of a warehouse distribution center. Employee does not include any person performing solely manufacturing, administrative, sales, accounting, human resources, or driving work at, or to and from, a warehouse distribution center. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end "Employee work speed data" means information an employer collects, stores, analyzes, or interprets relating to an individual employee's performance of a quota, including but not limited to quantities of tasks performed, quantities of items or materials handled or produced, rates or speeds of tasks performed, measurements or metrics of employee performance in relation to a quota, and time categorized as performing tasks or not performing tasks. Employee work speed data does not include itemized earnings statements pursuant to chapter 181, except for any content of those records that includes employee work speed data as defined in this paragraph. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end "Employer" means a person who meets the definition in section 182.651, subdivision 7, and who directly or indirectly, or through an agent or any other person, including through the services of a third-party employer, temporary service, or staffing agency or similar entity, employs or exercises control over the wages, hours, or working conditions of 250 or more employees at a single warehouse distribution center or 1,000 or more employees at one or more warehouse distribution centers in the state. For purposes of this paragraph, all employees of an employer's unitary business, as defined in section 290.17, subdivision 4, shall be counted in determining the number of employees employed at a single warehouse distribution center or at one or more warehouse distribution centers in the state. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end "Warehouse distribution center" means an establishment as defined by any of the following North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) codes: (1) 493110 for General Warehousing and Storage; (2) 423 for Merchant Wholesalers, Durable Goods; (3) 424 for Merchant Wholesalers, Nondurable Goods; (4) 454110 for Electronic Shopping and Mail-Order Houses; and (5) 492110 for Couriers and Express Delivery Services. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end "Quota" means a work standard under which: (1) an employee or group of employees is assigned or required to perform at a specified productivity speed, or perform a quantified number of tasks, or handle or produce a quantified amount of material, or perform without a certain number of errors or defects, as measured at the individual or group level within a defined time period; or (2) an employee's actions are categorized and measured between time performing tasks and not performing tasks, and the employee's failure to complete a task performance standard may have an adverse impact on the employee's continued employment. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 182.6526, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Automatic external defibrillators. new text end new text begin (a) Employers must provide employees with reasonable access to an automatic external defibrillator for use in cases of emergency. Employers must also ensure that every employee can be reached within 2.5 minutes by someone with a current certification for training: new text end new text begin (1) meeting the requirements of appendix B of Code of Federal Regulations, title 29, section 1910.266; new text end new text begin (2) including appropriate instructions from the AED manufacturer regarding use of the AED; new text end new text begin (3) conducted by a person with the requisite knowledge, training, and experience; and new text end new text begin (4) presented in a manner that the employee was able to understand, including using content and vocabulary appropriate to the educational level, literacy, and language skills of the employees being trained. new text end new text begin (b) The training under paragraph (a) must be documented by a written certification record containing the employee's name, dates of training, and the signature of either the person who conducted the training or the employer. If an employer relies on training conducted prior to the employee's hiring or completed prior to the effective date of this section, the certification record must indicate the date the employer determined the prior training was current and adequate. new text end new text begin (c) Employers must maintain records of the most recent training certification for every employee used to meet the requirements of this subdivision. new text end new text begin (d) Training certifications under this subdivision remain current for no longer than two years after the final date of training. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 182.6526, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Enforcement. (a) Subdivisions 2, paragraphs (a) to (c), 4, deleted text begin anddeleted text end 5new text begin , and 5anew text end shall be enforced by the commissioner under sections 182.66, 182.661, and 182.669. A violation of this section is subject to the penalties provided under sections 182.666 and 182.669. (b) A current or former employee aggrieved by a violation of this section may bring a civil cause of action for damages and injunctive relief to obtain compliance with this section; may receive other equitable relief as determined by a court, including reinstatement with back pay; and may, upon prevailing in the action, recover costs and reasonable attorney fees in that action. A cause of action under this section must be commenced within one year of the date of the violation. (c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent local enforcement of occupational health and safety standards that are more restrictive than this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end